Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
334D]

DIVERSION
PROGRAM FOR CHEMICALLY DEPENDENT NURSES

Section

334D-1 Findings and purpose

334D-2 Definitions

334D-3 Diversion program

334D-4 Civil immunity of third persons

334D-5 Records

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next